North Carolina statutes. Chapter 7B. Juvenile Code.
Article 10. Modification and Enforcement of Dispositional Orders; Appeals.

§ 7B-1000.
Authority to modify.

Upon motion in the cause or petition, and after notice, the court may conduct a modification hearing to determine whether the order of the court is in the best interests of the juvenile. The court may modify the order in light of changes in circumstances or the needs of the juvenile and address the issues raised in the motion that do not require a review or permanency planning hearing pursuant to

G.S. 7B-906.1

.

In any case where the court finds the juvenile to be abused, neglected, or dependent, the jurisdiction of the court to modify any order or disposition made in the case shall continue during the minority of the juvenile, until terminated by order of the court, or until the juvenile is otherwise emancipated.

When a motion is filed to conduct a modification hearing under this section and the guardian ad litem appointed through

G.S. 7B-601

has been previously released, the court shall reappoint a guardian ad litem and an attorney advocate. The clerk shall provide the motion and any notice of hearing to the guardian ad litem and the attorney advocate. The hearing on the motion shall not take place until the guardian ad litem and the attorney advocate have been reappointed.

When a motion is filed to conduct a modification hearing under this section and counsel for respondent parents appointed through

G.S. 7B-602

has been released, the court shall appoint provisional counsel in accordance with

G.S. 7B-602

.

The order shall be reduced to writing, signed, and entered no later than 30 days following the completion of the hearing. If the order is not entered within 30 days following completion of the hearing, the clerk of court for juvenile matters shall schedule a subsequent hearing at the first session of court scheduled for the hearing of juvenile matters following the 30-day period to determine and explain the reason for the delay and to obtain any needed clarification as to the contents of the order. The order shall be entered within 10 days of the subsequent hearing required by this subsection.

History.

1979, c. 815, s. 1; 1998-202, s. 6; 1999-456, s. 60; 2000-124, s. 3; 2013-129, s. 30; 2021-100, s. 16.

§ 7B-1001.
Right to appeal.

In a juvenile matter under this Subchapter, only the following final orders may be appealed directly to the Court of Appeals:

Any order finding absence of jurisdiction.

Any order, including the involuntary dismissal of a petition, which in effect determines the action and prevents a judgment from which appeal might be taken.

Any initial order of disposition and the adjudication order upon which it is based.

Any order, other than a nonsecure custody order, that changes legal custody of a juvenile.

An order under G.S. 7B-906.2(b) eliminating reunification, as defined by G.S. 7B-101(18c), as a permanent plan by either of the following:

A parent who is a party and:

Has preserved the right to appeal the order in writing within 30 days after entry and service of the order.

A termination of parental rights petition or motion has not been filed within 65 days of entry and service of the order.

A notice of appeal of the order eliminating reunification is filed within 30 days after the expiration of the 65 days.

A party who is a guardian or custodian with whom reunification is not a permanent plan.

Repealed by Session Laws 2017-41, s. 8(a), and Session Laws 2017-102, s. 40(f), effective January 1, 2019, and applicable to appeals filed on or after that date.

Any order that terminates parental rights or denies a petition or motion to terminate parental rights.

An order eliminating reunification as a permanent plan under G.S. 7B-906.2(b), if all of the following conditions are satisfied:

The right to appeal the order eliminating reunification has been preserved in writing within 30 days of entry and service of the order.

A motion or petition to terminate the parent’s rights is filed within 65 days of entry and service of the order eliminating reunification and both of the following occur:

The motion or petition to terminate rights is heard and granted.

The order terminating parental rights is appealed in a proper and timely manner.

A separate notice of appeal of the order eliminating reunification is filed within 30 days after entry and service of a termination of parental rights order.

(a1)

Repealed by Session Laws 2021-18, s. 2, effective July 1, 2021, and applicable to appeals filed on or after that date.

(a2)

In an appeal filed pursuant to subdivision (a)(8) of this section, the Court of Appeals shall review the order eliminating reunification together with an appeal of the order terminating parental rights. If the order eliminating reunification is vacated or reversed, the order terminating parental rights shall be vacated.

Notice of appeal and notice to preserve the right to appeal shall be given in writing by a proper party as defined in

G.S. 7B-1002

and shall be made within 30 days after entry and service of the order in accordance with

G.S. 1A-1

, Rule 58.

Notice of appeal shall be signed by both the appealing party and counsel for the appealing party, if any. In the case of an appeal by a juvenile, notice of appeal shall be signed by the guardian ad litem attorney advocate.

History.

1979, c. 815, s. 1; 1998-202, s. 6; 1999-456, s. 60; 2001-208, s. 25; 2001-487, s. 101; 2005-398, s. 10; 2011-295, s. 11; 2013-129, s. 31; 2015-136, s. 16; 2017-7, s. 4; 2017-41, s. 8(a); 2017-102, s. 40(f); 2019-33, s. 14(a); 2021-18, s. 2; 2021-100, s. 1(b); 2021-132, s. 1(b).

§ 7B-1002.
Proper parties for appeal.

Appeal from an order permitted under

G.S. 7B-1001

may be taken by:

A juvenile acting through the juvenile’s guardian ad litem previously appointed under

G.S. 7B-601

.

A juvenile for whom no guardian ad litem has been appointed under

G.S. 7B-601

. If such an appeal is made, the court shall appoint a guardian ad litem pursuant to

G.S. 1A-1

, Rule 17 for the juvenile for the purposes of that appeal.

A county department of social services.

A parent, a guardian appointed under

G.S. 7B-600

or Chapter 35A of the General Statutes, or a custodian as defined in

G.S. 7B-101

who is a nonprevailing party.

Any party that sought but failed to obtain termination of parental rights.

History.

1979, c. 815, s. 1; 1998-202, s. 6; 1999-456, s. 60; 2005-398, s. 11.

§ 7B-1003.
Disposition pending appeal.

During an appeal of an order entered under this Subchapter, the trial court may enforce the order unless the trial court or an appellate court orders a stay.

Pending disposition of an appeal, unless directed otherwise by an appellate court or subsection (c) of this section applies, the trial court shall:

Continue to exercise jurisdiction and conduct hearings under this Subchapter with the exception of Article 11 of the General Statutes; and

Enter orders affecting the custody or placement of the juvenile as the court finds to be in the best interests of the juvenile.

Pending disposition of an appeal of an order entered under Article 11 of this Chapter where the petition for termination of parental rights was not filed as a motion in a juvenile matter initiated under Article 4 of this Chapter, the court may enter a temporary order affecting the custody or placement of the juvenile as the court finds to be in the best interests of the juvenile. Upon the affirmation of the order of adjudication or disposition of the court in a juvenile case by the Court of Appeals, or by the Supreme Court in the event of an appeal, the court shall have authority to modify or alter its original order of adjudication or disposition as the court finds to be in the best interests of the juvenile to reflect any adjustment made by the juvenile or change in circumstances during the period of time the case on appeal was pending, provided that if the modifying order be entered ex parte, the court shall give notice to interested parties to show cause, if there be any, within 10 days thereafter, as to why the modifying order should be vacated or altered.

When the court has found that a juvenile has suffered physical abuse and that the individual responsible for the abuse has a history of violent behavior, the court shall consider the opinion of the mental health professional who performed the evaluation under G.S. 7B-503(b) before returning the juvenile to the custody of that individual pending resolution of an appeal.

The provisions of

G.S. 7B-903.1

shall apply to any order entered during an appeal that provides for the placement or continued placement of a juvenile in foster care.

History.

1979, c. 815, s. 1; 1987 (Reg. Sess., 1988), c. 1090, s. 12; 1998-202, s. 6; 1999-318, s. 8; 1999-456, s. 60; 2001-208, s. 27; 2001-487, s. 101; 2003-140, s. 8; 2005-398, s. 12; 2019-33, s. 14(b).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2019-33, s. 14(b), effective October 1, 2019, substituted “G.S. 7B-903.1” for “subsections (b), (c), and (d) of

G.S. 7B-905

” in subsection (e).

Legal Periodicals.

For article, “Juvenile Justice in Transition — A New Juvenile Code for North Carolina,” see 16 Wake Forest L. Rev. 1 (1980).

§ 7B-1004.
Disposition after appeal.

When an order of the court is affirmed by the Court of Appeals or by the Supreme Court, the trial court may modify or alter the original order as the court finds to be in the best interests of the juvenile to reflect any change in circumstances during the period of time the appeal was pending. If the modifying order is entered ex parte, the court shall give notice to interested parties to show cause within 10 days thereafter as to why the modifying order should be vacated or altered.

History.

1979, c. 815, s. 1; 1998-202, s. 6; 1999-456, s. 60; 2005-398, s. 13.